Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 7. Pearl River Bridges.

§ 65-23-301.
Citation.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Pearl River Bridge Revenue Bond Law”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-51; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-303.
Legislative determination.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the construction, operation, and maintenance of additional bridges and adjacent roadways across the flood plain of, and across, the Pearl River will promote the economic development of the state and will promote the general welfare of the entire people of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-52; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-305.
Construction by certain counties authorized.

Any county of this state bordering on the Pearl River is hereby authorized and empowered, separately or jointly, with any other county of the state bordering on the Pearl River:

To plan, construct, operate, and maintain a toll bridge or bridges and adjacent roadways across the flood plain of, and over and across, the Pearl River.

To issue bridge revenue bonds of such county or counties, payable from bridge earnings, to pay the cost of such bridges.

However, no bonds or liens given under authority of this article shall constitute a lien on any property of such county or counties other than the bridge or bridges constructed under this article, or a pledge of the revenues therefrom.

In the event two counties, acting jointly, exercise the powers conferred by this article, all acts shall be authorized by the governing body of each county, and in such event any revenue bonds issued shall be bonds of both of said counties.

To enter into contracts and/or agreements with any federal agencies, public agencies, or political subdivisions of any kind, including municipalities, corporations, districts, or others, for any financing, construction, operation, or maintenance requirements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-53; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-307.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:

The word “bridge” shall be deemed to include the structure and the superstructure of the bridge, the approaches thereto, and adjacent roadways across the flood plain of the Pearl River and also all property, rights, easements, and franchises relating thereto and deemed necessary or convenient for the operation thereof.

The term “governing body” shall mean the board of supervisors of a county or counties.

The term “cost of bridge,” as applied to a bridge to be constructed pursuant to the provisions hereof, shall embrace the cost of construction, the cost of all land, property, rights, easements, and franchises acquired, which are deemed necessary for such construction, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and for eighteen months after acceptance of the completed work by the governing body of such county or counties, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and of legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprise, administrative expense, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized and the construction of the bridge and the placing of the bridge in operation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-54; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-309.
Acquisition of rights of way.

Any such county acting separately or jointly with another county is hereby authorized and empowered to construct, whenever it shall deem such construction expedient, any toll bridge located as provided in Section 65-23-305. Authority is hereby granted to any such county or counties to purchase, solely from funds provided under the authority of this article, such lands, rights of way, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands under water and riparian rights of any person, copartnership, association, railroad or other corporation, municipality, or political subdivision, deemed necessary for the construction of any such bridge, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it or them to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it or them and the owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of such county or counties. Any such county or counties may acquire such lands, rights of way, easements, and other interest in land by eminent domain in the manner now provided by law. The State of Mississippi hereby consents to the use of all lands lying under water, which are within the state and are necessary for the construction and operation of any such bridge and the approaches and appurtenances thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-55; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-311.
Issuance of bonds authorized.

The governing body of any such county is hereby authorized to provide by resolution, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of bridge revenue bonds of such county, if acting separately, and of such counties, if acting jointly, for the purpose of paying the cost, as hereinabove defined, of any one or more of such bridges, which resolution shall recite an estimate of such cost. The principal and interest of such bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, payable semiannually, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the governing body of such county or counties, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the county or counties, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the governing body of such county or counties prior to the issuance of the bonds. The principal and interest of such bonds may be made payable in any lawful medium. The governing body of such county or counties shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds and any interest coupons attached thereto shall be executed in such manner as shall be determined by the governing body of the county or counties. In case any officer whose signature shall appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All bridge revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article are hereby declared to have, as between successive holders, all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the state. Provision may be made for the registration of any of the bonds in the name of the owner as to principal alone, in the manner now provided by law for the registration of bonds issued by a county. The governing body of such county or counties may sell such bonds at public or private sale in such manner and for such price as it or they may determine to be for the best interest of such county or counties, but no such sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent (6%) per annum, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds in accordance with standard tables of bond values. The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the bridge or bridges, and shall be disbursed under such restrictions, if any, as the governing body of such county or counties thereof may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the bridge or bridges, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and unless otherwise provided in the trust indenture hereinafter mentioned, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same bridge or bridges. If the proceeds of bonds issued for any bridge or bridges shall exceed the cost thereof, the surplus shall be paid into the fund hereinafter provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, such county or counties may, under like restrictions, issue temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter. The governing body of any such county or counties may also provide for the replacement of any bond which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost. Such bridge revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified and required by this article. The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition to the power conferred by any other law, general, special, or local, and this article, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full authority for the purpose hereof. In the discretion of the governing body of any such county or counties, bridge revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more bridges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-56; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-313.
Application of bond proceeds.

All moneys received from any bridge revenue bond issued pursuant to this article shall be applied solely to the payment of the cost of the bridge or bridges, or to the appurtenant sinking fund, and there is hereby created and granted a lien upon such moneys until so applied, in favor of the holders of such bonds or the trustee hereinafter provided in respect of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-57; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-315.
Trust indenture authorized.

In the discretion of the governing body of any such county or counties issuing bonds under the provisions of this article, each or any issue of such bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between such county or counties and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Said trust indenture may, in the discretion of the governing body, convey or mortgage the revenues, the bridge, or any part thereof.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of bridge revenue bonds or such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of such county or counties and the governing body thereof in relation to the construction, maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the bridges, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; and it may also provide that the bridge or bridges shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers employed or designated by the governing body of such county or counties and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor, and may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues of the bridges or other moneys pertaining thereto be satisfactory to such purchasers. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the governing body of such county or counties. Such indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. Except as in this article otherwise provided, the governing body of such county or counties may provide, by resolution or by such trust indenture, for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues of the bridges to such officer, board, or depository as it may determine for the custody thereof, and for the method of disbursement thereof with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the bridge or bridges affected by such indenture.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-58; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-317.
Application of tolls and charges.

The governing body of any such county or counties issuing bonds under the provisions of this article is hereby authorized to fix and to revise from time to time tolls for transit over such bridges, to charge and collect the same, and to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the use of any bridge, its approaches, appurtenances, or any part thereof for placing thereon water, gas, oil pipelines, telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, railroad or street railway tracks, or for any other purpose, and to fix the terms, conditions, rates, and charges for such use. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted, in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the bridge or bridges for which a single issue of bonds is issued, as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of the bridge or bridges, if any, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining, repairing, operating such bridge or bridges, and collecting tolls, and (b) the bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due. Such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any state commission, board, bureau, or agency, except such bureau or agency that might participate in the financing of the cost of any such bridge. The tolls from the bridge or bridges for which a single issue of bonds is issued, except such part thereof as may be required to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the bridge or bridges and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust indenture, in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of (1) the interest upon such bonds as such interest shall fall due, (2) the principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due, (3) the necessary fiscal agency charges for paying principal and interest, and (4) any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as herein provided. The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all bonds without distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or of the trust indenture, any moneys in such sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year’s interest on all bonds then outstanding may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be cancelled and shall not again be issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-59; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-319.
Bridges toll-free after bonds retired.

When the particular bonds issued for any bridge or bridges and the interest thereon shall have been paid, or a sufficient amount shall have been provided for their payment and shall continue to be held for that purpose, the county or counties issuing such bonds shall cease to charge tolls for the use of such bridge or bridges; and thereafter such bridge or bridges shall be free.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-60; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-321.
Enforcement of bondholders’ rights.

Any holder of any bonds issued under the provisions of this article or of any of the coupons attached thereto, and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted hereunder or under such resolution or trust indenture, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this article or by such resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the county or counties, its or their governing body, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of tolls for transit over such bridges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-61; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-323.
Grants and preliminary loans.

Any county or counties, acting pursuant to the terms of this article, in addition to the revenues which may be received from the sale of bridge revenue bonds and from the collection of tolls and other bridge revenues derived under the provisions of this article, shall have authority to receive and accept from any federal agency, or state, or state agency, or other political subdivisions, loans or grants for or in the aid of the construction or acquisition of any bridge, and to receive and accept contributions from any source of either money or property or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such grants and contributions may be made.

Authority is hereby granted to any such county or counties to secure loans to finance planning of the bridges herein authorized from any governmental agency, repayable solely from the sale of said revenue bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-62; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-325.
Powers and duties of governing bodies of counties issuing bonds.

The governing body of any county or counties issuing its or their bonds under the provisions of this article shall have power to make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the execution of its powers under this article, may employ engineering and construction experts, inspectors, attorneys, and such other employees as may be deemed necessary, and may fix their compensation. All such compensation and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be paid solely from funds provided under the authority of this article, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred hereunder beyond the extent to which money shall have been provided under the authority of this article. All public or private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted under this article shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition, as nearly as practicable, or adequate compensation made therefor out of funds provided by this article.

The powers and duties of counties and the governing bodies thereof hereinabove enumerated in this article shall not be construed as a limitation on the general powers or duties of such counties or the governing bodies thereof. It shall be the duty of the governing body of any county or counties issuing its bonds pursuant to the provisions of this article, in addition to the powers and duties enumerated in this article, to do and perform any and all things and acts necessary in the construction, maintenance, and operation of any bridge to be constructed under the provisions of this article, to the end that such bridge or bridges may become and be operated free of tolls as early as possible and practicable, subject only to the express limitations of this article and the limitations of the other laws and constitutional provisions applicable thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-63; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-327.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers conferred by this article constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, and as bridges which are owned and operated by counties constitute public property used for public purposes, such bridges shall at all times be free from taxation within the state. No county shall be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any such bridge or any part thereof owned by it, and bonds issued under the provisions of this article, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation within the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-64; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-329.
Construction and operation of article.

This article, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. But this article shall not be construed to repeal the laws under which any bridge has heretofore been constructed or operated by any county of the state and, as to such counties, the present laws shall remain in force and effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-65; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 65-23-331.
Bonds not limited by issuing county’s valuation of taxable property.

Such bonds may be issued for the purpose stated above and, regardless of the amount thereof, same shall not be subject to the limitations as to amount of bonded debt based upon amount of the assessed value of taxable property in a county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8447-67; Laws, 1964, ch. 277, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).